Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB585.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.2. Prohibition of certain fee charges.--(a) Subject to Federal law and regulation, a person may not charge a consumer an additional rate or fee or a differential in the rate or fee associated with payment on an account when the consumer chooses to pay by the United States mail or receive a paper billing statement.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person from offering consumers a credit or other incentive to 12345678910111213141516171819 elect a specific payment or billing option.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0585PN0592 - 2 - 12